public_html/app/tools/lang/data/vec2.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX A r sa [ao]rnir
SFX A r sa [au]rbir
SFX A r sa [bfjnptvx]erir
SFX A r sa [blnrt]uir
SFX A r sa [ckmux]arir
SFX A r sa [dgiptu]rir
SFX A r sa [eiou]lir
SFX A r sa [fiktxđ]alir
SFX A r sa [fsx]ierir
SFX A r sa [ft]erdir
SFX A r sa [ft]orbir
SFX A r sa [ir]morir
SFX A r sa [jl]estir
SFX A r sa arguir
SFX A r sa censir
SFX A r sa derokir
SFX A r sa desavir
SFX A r sa dir
SFX A r sa interiŧir
SFX A r sa interlokuir
SFX A r sa intiriŧir
SFX A r sa karpir
SFX A r sa orir
SFX A r sa ortir
SFX A r sa parir
SFX A r sa partir
SFX A r sa pervertir
SFX A r sa rokir
SFX A r sa skarmir
SFX A r sa sorbir
SFX A r sa superbir
SFX A r sa vertir
SFX A r sa xmartir
SFX A r sa xmentir
SFX A r sa ŧernir
SFX A r sa ŧerpir
SFX A r sa ŧirkuir
SFX A r sa ŧokir
SFX A r se [acfgjoxđ]ir
SFX A r se [ae]mir
SFX A r se [aeilou]tir
SFX A r se [ai]nsir
SFX A r se [ailoru]sir
SFX A r se [aio]stir
SFX A r se [ao]ntir
SFX A r se [au]rbir
SFX A r se [ckmux]arir
SFX A r se [dgiptu]rir
SFX A r se [eiou]lir
SFX A r se [fiktxđ]alir
SFX A r se [ft]orbir
SFX A r se [ir]morir
SFX A r se [jl]estir
SFX A r se arguir
SFX A r se censir
SFX A r se orir
SFX A r se ortir
SFX A r se skarmir
SFX A r se xmartir
SFX A r se xmentir
SFX A r se/I [abcdefmnpstvxñđŧ]olar
SFX A r se/I [abcdfgijknopstvxŧ]etar
SFX A r se/I [abcdfjkmpsv]iđar
SFX A r se/I [abcdfklnoprstuvxđŧ]inar
SFX A r se/I [abcefgijklmnpsvxđŧ]onar
SFX A r se/I [abdefklmopsvx]itar
SFX A r se/I [abdfgijklmnpstxñđ]orar
SFX A r se/I [abdfgikmst]urar
SFX A r se/I [abdfijkmnprstuŧ]elar
SFX A r se/I [abdgiotu]riđar
SFX A r se/I [abfgptu]regar
SFX A r se/I [abfjlnpr]utar
SFX A r se/I [abfkx]renar
SFX A r se/I [abfot]raŧar
SFX A r se/I [abik]rokar
SFX A r se/I [abikoptu]riar
SFX A r se/I [acfgjlmosxđ]ir
SFX A r se/I [adfgioptu]rir
SFX A r se/I [adiopt]ronar
SFX A r se/I [adklpstuvđŧ]enar
SFX A r se/I [aeilnosu]tir
SFX A r se/I [aeilnsu]kar
SFX A r se/I [aeinosu]tegar
SFX A r se/I [aeio]strar
SFX A r se/I [aeiop]letar
SFX A r se/I [aeiou]xenar
SFX A r se/I [aeiru]ñar
SFX A r se/I [aeiu]ngar
SFX A r se/I [aeiu]ŧiar
SFX A r se/I [aelo]var
SFX A r se/I [aenoux]golar
SFX A r se/I [aeo]liar
SFX A r se/I [aeors]tiđar
SFX A r se/I [aeou]mentar
SFX A r se/I [agot]rejar
SFX A r se/I [ai]erar
SFX A r se/I [ai]ñaŧar
SFX A r se/I [ail]gar
SFX A r se/I [ailnou]sar
SFX A r se/I [ailnu]bar
SFX A r se/I [ailu]minar
SFX A r se/I [aiou]rmar
SFX A r se/I [aisu]kiar
SFX A r se/I [aku]rifegar
SFX A r se/I [als]tar
SFX A r se/I [an]deđar
SFX A r se/I [an]fraxar
SFX A r se/I [an]kuerar
SFX A r se/I [an]kuirar
SFX A r se/I [ano]fegar
SFX A r se/I [ao]er
SFX A r se/I [ao]ler
SFX A r se/I [ao]niđar
SFX A r se/I [ao]rcar
SFX A r se/I [ao]rdar
SFX A r se/I [ao]rdonar
SFX A r se/I [ao]rkar
SFX A r se/I [ao]rnar
SFX A r se/I [ao]rsar
SFX A r se/I [ao]rtir
SFX A r se/I [aou]nŧiar
SFX A r se/I [aou]rbar
SFX A r se/I [aou]rbir
SFX A r se/I [aou]rgar
SFX A r se/I [aou]rkiar
SFX A r se/I [aou]rlar
SFX A r se/I [aou]rtar
SFX A r se/I [aou]rŧar
SFX A r se/I [ar]naliđar
SFX A r se/I [aux]nar
SFX A r se/I [bcdefgijmnpsvxđŧ]otar
SFX A r se/I [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A r se/I [bcfgiklnoprtŧ]eđar
SFX A r se/I [bcfgjklmnoptuv]aŧar
SFX A r se/I [bcfilrtđ]ugar
SFX A r se/I [bcmpruŧ]efar
SFX A r se/I [bdegikmprstđ]aliđar
SFX A r se/I [bdflmvđ]ogar
SFX A r se/I [bdfmnptvx]iar
SFX A r se/I [bdgklmnptuv]ajar
SFX A r se/I [bdgkpv]rar
SFX A r se/I [bdilmnopsvxñđŧ]egar
SFX A r se/I [bdklmoprtuv]acar
SFX A r se/I [bfilmtuv]antar
SFX A r se/I [bgknpstv]axar
SFX A r se/I [bjklmrt]oŧar
SFX A r se/I [blmpstvx]irar
SFX A r se/I [blprsvx]ear
SFX A r se/I [bmnpxŧ]igolar
SFX A r se/I [bmtŧ]iliar
SFX A r se/I [bou]rogar
SFX A r se/I [bp]erlar
SFX A r se/I [btv]ergar
SFX A r se/I [bxŧ]eregar
SFX A r se/I [cfglopsv]esar
SFX A r se/I [clmnrsv]odar
SFX A r se/I [dfgklmnopst]ejar
SFX A r se/I [dg]obar
SFX A r se/I [dgkmnprs]uar
SFX A r se/I [dijlorstuvxđ]entar
SFX A r se/I [dlnstxñŧ]ifegar
SFX A r se/I [dltv]ernar
SFX A r se/I [eilnu]ŧar
SFX A r se/I [eilox]mar
SFX A r se/I [einoru]xar
SFX A r se/I [einosu]car
SFX A r se/I [eiu]xurar
SFX A r se/I [eo]liđar
SFX A r se/I [eo]ntiđar
SFX A r se/I [es]kotar
SFX A r se/I [es]ŧervelar
SFX A r se/I [fjkx]ermar
SFX A r se/I [fklrsx]oñar
SFX A r se/I [fm]eretar
SFX A r se/I [fpvŧ]iolar
SFX A r se/I [fŧ]etuar
SFX A r se/I [gin]ritar
SFX A r se/I [iln]trar
SFX A r se/I [inru]jar
SFX A r se/I [io]ntar
SFX A r se/I [io]rkolar
SFX A r se/I [ipt]ađar
SFX A r se/I [ipu]lar
SFX A r se/I [irst]umar
SFX A r se/I [klt]ivar
SFX A r se/I [kp]avejar
SFX A r se/I [kt]erŧar
SFX A r se/I [lmtxŧ]enŧiar
SFX A r se/I [ln]etrar
SFX A r se/I [lnoru]đar
SFX A r se/I [mp]eritar
SFX A r se/I [mv]ergolar
SFX A r se/I [nr]guir
SFX A r se/I [ns]erbar
SFX A r se/I [ns]ervar
SFX A r se/I [ns]kuercar
SFX A r se/I [nsv]edar
SFX A r se/I [nx]goŧar
SFX A r se/I [op]ar
SFX A r se/I [ox]longar
SFX A r se/I [pt]erveñir
SFX A r se/I [pt]resar
SFX A r se/I [pt]rotar
SFX A r se/I [stŧ]imentar
SFX A r se/I [sŧ]erkar
SFX A r se/I [tuv]iliđar
SFX A r se/I [tv]eriđar
SFX A r se/I [tv]erniđar
SFX A r se/I [xŧ]ertar
SFX A r se/I alar
SFX A r se/I alienar
SFX A r se/I amar
SFX A r se/I arar
SFX A r se/I arveñir
SFX A r se/I aver
SFX A r se/I bersajar
SFX A r se/I bertonar
SFX A r se/I bordeđar
SFX A r se/I dar
SFX A r se/I deramar
SFX A r se/I derenar
SFX A r se/I derivar
SFX A r se/I derobar
SFX A r se/I derokar
SFX A r se/I derotar
SFX A r se/I desferenŧiar
SFX A r se/I devorar
SFX A r se/I devorŧiar
SFX A r se/I dexeredar
SFX A r se/I dexverxenar
SFX A r se/I donar
SFX A r se/I exerŧitar
SFX A r se/I far
SFX A r se/I fermentar
SFX A r se/I fumar
SFX A r se/I griliar
SFX A r se/I guernar
SFX A r se/I inbaretar
SFX A r se/I infervorar
SFX A r se/I inkartonar
SFX A r se/I intarsiar
SFX A r se/I interesar
SFX A r se/I interkalar
SFX A r se/I interkuerar
SFX A r se/I interkuirar
SFX A r se/I interlinear
SFX A r se/I intermeđar
SFX A r se/I interogar
SFX A r se/I interpretar
SFX A r se/I inveriar
SFX A r se/I inversiar
SFX A r se/I inŧercelar
SFX A r se/I kalar
SFX A r se/I kalefar
SFX A r se/I kantar
SFX A r se/I kolar
SFX A r se/I korniđar
SFX A r se/I koñer
SFX A r se/I kriolar
SFX A r se/I kurvar
SFX A r se/I lotar
SFX A r se/I lumar
SFX A r se/I lustrar
SFX A r se/I maravejar
SFX A r se/I menar
SFX A r se/I meravejar
SFX A r se/I merkantar
SFX A r se/I merkantiđar
SFX A r se/I međar
SFX A r se/I mojar
SFX A r se/I mudarar
SFX A r se/I ojar
SFX A r se/I okar
SFX A r se/I ormeđar
SFX A r se/I parer
SFX A r se/I perdonar
SFX A r se/I perfumar
SFX A r se/I perifraxar
SFX A r se/I periodar
SFX A r se/I perkolar
SFX A r se/I perkotar
SFX A r se/I perletar
SFX A r se/I perlustrar
SFX A r se/I permaner
SFX A r se/I permudarar
SFX A r se/I permutar
SFX A r se/I perorar
SFX A r se/I perpetrar
SFX A r se/I perpetuar
SFX A r se/I perseguir
SFX A r se/I perseguitar
SFX A r se/I personaliđar
SFX A r se/I persugar
SFX A r se/I pertegar
SFX A r se/I poder
SFX A r se/I pongar
SFX A r se/I rajar
SFX A r se/I ramar
SFX A r se/I raxar
SFX A r se/I redar
SFX A r se/I remaner
SFX A r se/I rigolar
SFX A r se/I rivar
SFX A r se/I robar
SFX A r se/I roersar
SFX A r se/I rolar
SFX A r se/I sajar
SFX A r se/I saver
SFX A r se/I scantiđar
SFX A r se/I seguir
SFX A r se/I seguitar
SFX A r se/I serajar
SFX A r se/I servir
SFX A r se/I siar
SFX A r se/I skortegar
SFX A r se/I sotolinear
SFX A r se/I soverkiar
SFX A r se/I spergoŧar
SFX A r se/I sperimentar
SFX A r se/I sperlongar
SFX A r se/I spernacar
SFX A r se/I speronar
SFX A r se/I sperđurar
SFX A r se/I steriliđar
SFX A r se/I sugar
SFX A r se/I terapienar
SFX A r se/I teraŧar
SFX A r se/I termenar
SFX A r se/I terminar
SFX A r se/I terŧariolar
SFX A r se/I teñir
SFX A r se/I tonar
SFX A r se/I tormentar
SFX A r se/I tuar
SFX A r se/I vejar
SFX A r se/I velar
SFX A r se/I verdeđar
SFX A r se/I vergiđar
SFX A r se/I vergoñar
SFX A r se/I verifegar
SFX A r se/I verigolar
SFX A r se/I verolar
SFX A r se/I versar
SFX A r se/I verxurar
SFX A r se/I verđelar
SFX A r se/I veñir
SFX A r se/I xberlefar
SFX A r se/I xberlotar
SFX A r se/I xberlumar
SFX A r se/I xberxelar
SFX A r se/I xeguir
SFX A r se/I xelar
SFX A r se/I xermojar
SFX A r se/I xgoñar
SFX A r se/I xlargiđar
SFX A r se/I xmerdar
SFX A r se/I xmerejar
SFX A r se/I xmeriliar
SFX A r se/I xmerŧiar
SFX A r se/I xmorgolar
SFX A r se/I xnervađar
SFX A r se/I xvergoñaŧar
SFX A r se/I đurar
SFX A r se/I ŧercar
SFX A r se/I ŧitar
SFX A r se/IJR [acfgjoxđ]ir
SFX A r se/IJR [ae]mir
SFX A r se/IJR [aeilou]tir
SFX A r se/IJR [aeinu]kir
SFX A r se/IJR [aeiou]nir
SFX A r se/IJR [aeiu]bir
SFX A r se/IJR [ai]nsir
SFX A r se/IJR [ailoru]sir
SFX A r se/IJR [aio]stir
SFX A r se/IJR [aiou]ñir
SFX A r se/IJR [alnoru]ŧir
SFX A r se/IJR [anou]pir
SFX A r se/IJR [ao]ntir
SFX A r se/IJR [ao]rdir
SFX A r se/IJR [ao]rnir
SFX A r se/IJR [au]rbir
SFX A r se/IJR [bfjnptvx]erir
SFX A r se/IJR [blnrt]uir
SFX A r se/IJR [ckmux]arir
SFX A r se/IJR [dgiptu]rir
SFX A r se/IJR [eiou]lir
SFX A r se/IJR [fiktxđ]alir
SFX A r se/IJR [fsx]ierir
SFX A r se/IJR [ft]erdir
SFX A r se/IJR [ft]orbir
SFX A r se/IJR [ir]morir
SFX A r se/IJR [jl]estir
SFX A r se/IJR arguir
SFX A r se/IJR censir
SFX A r se/IJR derokir
SFX A r se/IJR desavir
SFX A r se/IJR dir
SFX A r se/IJR interiŧir
SFX A r se/IJR interlokuir
SFX A r se/IJR intiriŧir
SFX A r se/IJR karpir
SFX A r se/IJR orir
SFX A r se/IJR ortir
SFX A r se/IJR parir
SFX A r se/IJR partir
SFX A r se/IJR pervertir
SFX A r se/IJR rokir
SFX A r se/IJR skarmir
SFX A r se/IJR sorbir
SFX A r se/IJR superbir
SFX A r se/IJR vertir
SFX A r se/IJR xmartir
SFX A r se/IJR xmentir
SFX A r se/IJR ŧernir
SFX A r se/IJR ŧerpir
SFX A r se/IJR ŧirkuir
SFX A r se/IJR ŧokir
SFX A r sede [acfgjoxđ]ir
SFX A r sede [ae]mir
SFX A r sede [aeilou]tir
SFX A r sede [aeinu]kir
SFX A r sede [aeiou]nir
SFX A r sede [aeiu]bir
SFX A r sede [ai]nsir
SFX A r sede [ailoru]sir
SFX A r sede [aio]stir
SFX A r sede [aiou]ñir
SFX A r sede [alnoru]ŧir
SFX A r sede [anou]pir
SFX A r sede [ao]ntir
SFX A r sede [ao]rdir
SFX A r sede [ao]rnir
SFX A r sede [au]rbir
SFX A r sede [bfjnptvx]erir
SFX A r sede [blnrt]uir
SFX A r sede [ckmux]arir
SFX A r sede [dgiptu]rir
SFX A r sede [eiou]lir
SFX A r sede [fiktxđ]alir
SFX A r sede [fsx]ierir
SFX A r sede [ft]erdir
SFX A r sede [ft]orbir
SFX A r sede [ir]morir
SFX A r sede [jl]estir
SFX A r sede arguir
SFX A r sede censir
SFX A r sede derokir
SFX A r sede desavir
SFX A r sede dir
SFX A r sede interiŧir
SFX A r sede interlokuir
SFX A r sede intiriŧir
SFX A r sede karpir
SFX A r sede orir
SFX A r sede ortir
SFX A r sede rokir
SFX A r sede skarmir
SFX A r sede superbir
SFX A r sede xmartir
SFX A r sede xmentir
SFX A r sede ŧernir
SFX A r sede ŧerpir
SFX A r sede ŧirkuir
SFX A r sede ŧokir
SFX A r sege [acfgjoxđ]ir
SFX A r sege [ae]mir
SFX A r sege [aeilou]tir
SFX A r sege [aeinu]kir
SFX A r sege [aeiou]nir
SFX A r sege [aeiu]bir
SFX A r sege [ai]nsir
SFX A r sege [ailoru]sir
SFX A r sege [aio]stir
SFX A r sege [aiou]ñir
SFX A r sege [alnoru]ŧir
SFX A r sege [anou]pir
SFX A r sege [ao]ntir
SFX A r sege [ao]rdir
SFX A r sege [ao]rnir
SFX A r sege [au]rbir
SFX A r sege [bfjnptvx]erir
SFX A r sege [blnrt]uir
SFX A r sege [ckmux]arir
SFX A r sege [dgiptu]rir
SFX A r sege [eiou]lir
SFX A r sege [fiktxđ]alir
SFX A r sege [fsx]ierir
SFX A r sege [ft]erdir
SFX A r sege [ft]orbir
SFX A r sege [ir]morir
SFX A r sege [jl]estir
SFX A r sege arguir
SFX A r sege censir
SFX A r sege derokir
SFX A r sege desavir
SFX A r sege dir
SFX A r sege interiŧir
SFX A r sege interlokuir
SFX A r sege intiriŧir
SFX A r sege karpir
SFX A r sege orir
SFX A r sege ortir
SFX A r sege rokir
SFX A r sege skarmir
SFX A r sege superbir
SFX A r sege xmartir
SFX A r sege xmentir
SFX A r sege ŧernir
SFX A r sege ŧerpir
SFX A r sege ŧirkuir
SFX A r sege ŧokir
SFX A r sen [acfgjoxđ]ir
SFX A r sen [ae]mir
SFX A r sen [aeilou]tir
SFX A r sen [aeinu]kir
SFX A r sen [aeiou]nir
SFX A r sen [aeiu]bir
SFX A r sen [ai]nsir
SFX A r sen [ailoru]sir
SFX A r sen [aio]stir
SFX A r sen [aiou]ñir
SFX A r sen [alnoru]ŧir
